Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

[§641-31] Bonds, costs, failure to file or
pay, defects. Failure of an appellant to file a bond or to pay costs, or
informality or insufficiency of a bond or payment of costs, does not affect the
validity of the appeal, but is ground only for such remedies as are specified
by the rules of court or, when no remedy is specified, for such action as the
court having jurisdiction deems appropriate, which may include dismissal of the
appeal. [L 1895, c 25, §2; am L 1905, c 14, §1; RL 1925, §2538; RL 1935, §3506;
RL 1945, §9508; am L Sp 1949, c 41, §1; RL 1955, §208-8; HRS §641-43; am L
1972, c 89, pt of §5; ren HRS §641-31]

Rules of Court

Bond on motion for new trial, see HRCP rule 62.

Case Notes

The effectiveness of a notice of appeal is not conditioned
upon payment of costs. 57 H. 168, 552 P.2d 355 (1976).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next